Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.205

Local government accounting—Costs of public works—Standard form.

The state auditor shall prescribe a standard form with which the accounts and records of costs of all local governments shall be maintained as required under RCW 39.04.070.

[ 1995 c 301 s 10; 1987 c 120 s 4.]